updates/files/_internal/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_fr.dic
tchin3t2
1te
4te.
1té
1tè
1tê
té1lé
télé1e2
télé1i2
télé1o2b
télé1o2p
télé1s2
tem1pé
tempé1ra
tempéra1me
tempéra3ment.
2tent.
ter1ge
ter3gent.
4tes.
tes1ta
testa1me
testa3ment.
1t2h
.1t2h4
4th.
t1he
4t4he.
ther1mo
thermo1s2
4t4hes.
2t3heur
2thl
2thm
2thn
th2r
th1re
4th4re.
4th4res.
th1ri
thril3l
2ths
1ti
1tî
1to
1tô
to1me
to2ment.
tor1re
tor3rent.
1t2r
.1t2r
t1ra
tran2s1a2
tran3s2act
tran3s2ats
tran2s3h
tran2s1o2
tran2s3p
trans1pa
transpa1re
transpa3rent.
tran2s1u2
t1re
4t4re.
2t2rent.
4t4res.
.t1ri
t1ri
.tri1a2c
.tri1a2n
.tri1a2t
tri1de
tri3dent.
.tri1o2n
t1ru
tru1cu
trucu1le
trucu3lent.
t1t2l
1tu
1tû
tu1me
tu2ment.
tung2s3
tur1bu
turbu1le
turbu3lent.
1ty
.u4
'u4
.û4
'û4
u1ci
ucil4l
ue1vi
uevil4l
u1ni
uni1a2x
uni1o2v
u2s3t2r
u1vi
uvil4l
1va
1vâ
va1ci
vacil4l
va1ni
vanil2l
vanil1li
vanil3lin
vanil3lis
1ve
4ve.
1vé
1vè
1vê
vé1lo
vélo1s2ki
ve1ni
veni1me
veni2ment.
2vent.
ven1t2r
vent1ri
ventri1po
ventripo1te
ventripo3tent.
4ves.
1vi
1vî
vi1di
vidi1me
vidi2ment.
vil3l
1vo
1vô
vol1ta
vol2t1amp
1v2r
v1re
4v4re.
2v2rent.
4v4res.
1vu
1vû
1vy
1wa
wa2g3n
1we
4we.
2went.
4wes.
1wi
1wo
1w2r
1wu
2xent.
xil3l
.y4
'y4
y1al1gi
y1as1t2h
ys1to
y1s2tom
1za
1ze
4ze.
1zé
1zè
2zent.
4zes.
1zi
1zo
1zu
1zy
%
% Additional patterns
%
2’2
’a4
-8a4
4a-
-8á4
.á4
'á4
4á-
’á4
-8à4
4à-
.à4
'à4
’à4
’â4
-8â4
4â-
4å-
-8å4
.å4
'å4
’å4
.ä4
-8ä4
'ä4
’ä4
4ä-
’ã4
-8ã4
'ã4
4ã-
.ã4
abî2ment-
’a1b2r
-8a1b2r
’ab1ré
-8ab1ré
’ab3réa
-8ab3réa
ab3sent-
absti3nent-
ac3cent-
acquies4cent-
.æ4
'æ4
’æ4
4æ-
-8æ4
-8ae3s4c2h
’ae3s4c2h
’a1g2n
-8a1g2n
’ag1na
-8ag1na
’a2g3nat
-8a2g3nat
ai2ment-
amalga2ment-
â2ment-
’a1mi
-8a1mi
-8ami1no
’ami1no
’amino1a2c
-8amino1a2c
’a1na
-8a1na
’ana3s4t2r
-8ana3s4t2r
ani2ment-
’an1ti
-8an1ti
’anti1a2
-8anti1a2
’anti1e2
-8anti1e2
’anti1é2
-8anti1é2
’anti2en1ne
-8anti2en1ne
antifer3ment-
’anti1s2
-8anti1s2
-8a1po
’a1po
’apo2s3ta
-8apo2s3ta
appa3rent-
-8ar1de
'ar1de
’ar1de
’ar3dent.
'ar3dent-
’ar3dent-
-8ar3dent-
'ar3dent.
-8ar3dent.
.ar3dent-
-ar3dent-
-8ar1ge
’ar1ge
’ar3gent-
.ar3gent-
-ar3gent-
-8ar3gent-
'ar3gent-
-8ar3gent.
’ar3gent.
ar2ment-
-8ar1pe
’ar1pe
’ar3pent.
'ar3pent-
.ar3pent-
-ar3pent-
-8ar3pent-
’ar3pent-
-8ar3pent.
as2ment-
-8as2ta
’as2ta
au2ment-
4b-
’b4
'b4
.b4
-8b4
-8ba
-8bai1se
-8baise1ma
-8bai2se3main
4be-
2bent-
4bes-
-8bi
-8bi1a2c
-8bi1a2t
-8bi1au
-8bio1a2
-8bi2s1a2
-8bi1u2
4b4le-
2b2lent-
4b4les-
bou2ment-
4b4re-
2b2rent-
4b4res-
bru2ment-
.c4
-8c4
'c4
’c4
4c-
'ç4
.ç4
’ç4
4ç-
-8ç4
carê2ment-
cci3dent-
4ce-
2cent-
4ces-
4ch-
-8c2h4
4c4he-
-8c1hè
2chent-
4c4hes-
-8chè1v2r
-8chèv1re
-8chèvre1fe
-8chèvrefeuil2l
-8chè2vre3feuil1le
chien3dent-
4ch4le-
4ch4les-
4ch4re-
4ch4res-
chro2ment-
-8ci
-8ci1sa
-8ci2s1alp
4ck-
4c4ke-
2c2kent-
4c4kes-
cla2ment-
4c4le-
2c2lent-
4c4les-
-8co
-8com1me
.com3ment-
-8com3ment-
-8com3ment.
-com3ment-
compé3tent-
-8con4
confi3dent-
conni3vent-
-8cons4
conti3nent-
contin3gent-
-8con1t2r
-8cont1re
-8contre1ma
-8contremaî1t2r
-8cont1re3maît1re
-8contre1s2c
-8co1o2
-8coo1li
-8co2o3lie
corpu3lent-
4c4re-
2c2rent-
4c4res-
-8cu
-8cul4
cur3rent-
1d2’2
'd4
.d4
-8d4
’d4
4d-
-8ð4
4ð-
’ð4
'ð4
.ð4
-8da
-8da1c2r
-8dac1ry
-8dacryo1a2
da2ment-
4de-
-8dé
-8dé1a2
déca3dent-
-8dé1io
2dent-
-8dé1o2
4des-
-8dé2s
-8dé1sa
-8dé3s2a3c2r
-8dés2a3m
-8dé3s2as1t2r
-8désa1te
-8dé3s2a3tell
-8dé3s2c
-8dé1se
-8dé2s1é2
-8dé3s2é3g2r
-8désen1si
-8dé3s2ensib
-8dé3s2ert
-8dé3s2exu
-8dé2s1i2
-8dé3s2i3d
-8dé3s2i3g2n
-8dé3s2i3li
-8dési1ne
-8dé3s2i3nen
-8dé3s2in1vo
-8dé3s2i3r
-8dé3s2ist
-8dé1so
-8dé3s2o3dé
-8dé2s1œ
-8dé3s2o3l
-8déso1pi
-8dé3s2o3pil
-8dé3s2orm
-8dé3s2orp
-8dé3s2ou1f2r
-8dé3s2p
-8dé3s2t
-8dé1su
-8dé2s1u2n
détri3ment-
-8di
-8di1a2cé
-8dia1ci
-8di1a2cid
-8di1ald
-8di1a2mi
diaphrag2ment-
-8dia1to
-8di1a2tom
-8di1e2n
dili3gent-
-8di2s3h
dissi3dent-
2d2lent-
-8do
-8do1le
-do3lent-
-8do3lent.
.do3lent-
-8do3lent-
4d4re-
2d2rent-
4d4res-
-8dy
-8dy2s3
-8dy2s1a2
-8dy2s1i2
-8dy2s1o2
-8dy2s1u2
’e4
4e-
-8e4
’é4
4é-
-8é4
’è4
4è-
-8è4
4ê-
’ê4
-8ê4
4ë-
-8ë4
’ë4
'ë4
.ë4
é3cent-
éci2ment-
écu2ment-
é3dent-
éli2ment-
élo3quent-
è2ment-
’é1mi
'é1mi
-8é1mi
’émi1ne
'émi1ne
-8émi1ne
'émi3nent-
-émi3nent-
.émi3nent-
-8émi3nent.
'émi3nent.
’émi3nent.
’émi3nent-
-8émi3nent-
’e1n1a2
-8e1n1a2
éni3tent-
’e1n1o2
-8e1n1o2
entre3gent-
é3quent-
équipo3tent-
équiva4lent-
é3rent-
er2ment-
es3cent-
esti2ment-
-8eu2r1a2
’eu2r1a2
-8f4
4f-
’f4
'f4
.f4
fa2ment-
4fe-
fécu3lent-
2fent-
4fes-
fichu3ment-
fir2ment-
flam2ment-
4f4le-
2f2lent-
4f4les-
4f4re-
2f2rent-
4f4res-
fu2ment-
.g4
'g4
’g4
4g-
-8g4
-8ge
4ge-
-8gem1me
-gem2ment-
-8gem2ment-
-8gem2ment.
.gem2ment-
2gent-
4ges-
4g4le-
2g2lent-
4g4les-
4g4ne-
2g2nent-
4g4nes-
gram2ment-
grandilo3quent-
4g4re-
2g2rent-
4g4res-
4gue-
2guent-
4gues-
.h4
'h4
’h4
4h-
-8h4
4he-
4hes-
hu2ment-
-8i4
’i4
4i-
.í4
'í4
’í4
4í-
-8í4
.ì4
'ì4
’ì4
4ì-
-8ì4
’î4
4î-
-8î4
'ï4
4ï-
.ï4
-8ï4
’ï4
-8i1g2n
’i1g2n
-8i2g3né
’i2g3né
-8i2g3ni
’i2g3ni
imma3nent-
immi3nent-
immis4cent-
impo3tent-
impu3dent-
-8i1n1a2
’i1n1a2
-8ina1ni
’ina1ni
’in2a3nit
-8in2a3nit
’inau1gu
-8inau1gu
’in2augur
-8in2augur
inci3dent-
indi3gent-
indo3lent-
indul3gent-
’i1n1e2
-8i1n1e2
’i1n1é2
-8i1n1é2
’inef1fa
-8inef1fa
-8in2effab
’in2effab
’iné1lu
-8iné1lu
-8in2é3luc1ta
’in2é3luc1ta
-8iné1na
’iné1na
-8in2é3nar1ra
’in2é3nar1ra
-8in2ept
’in2ept
-8in2er
’in2er
-8in2exo1ra
’in2exo1ra
-8i1n1i2
’i1n1i2
-8ini1mi
’ini1mi
’in2i3mi1ti
-8in2i3mi1ti
-8in2i3q
’in2i3q
-8in2i3t
’in2i3t
inno3cent-
-8i1n1o2
’i1n1o2
-8ino1cu
’ino1cu
-8in2o3cul
’in2o3cul
-8in2ond
’in2ond
inso3lent-
-8ins1ta
’ins1ta
’in1s2tab
-8in1s2tab
-8in1te
’in1te
intelli3gent-
-8inte4r3
’inte4r3
-8inte1ra2
’inte1ra2
-8inte1re2
’inte1re2
-8inte1ré2
’inte1ré2
-8inte1ri2
’inte1ri2
’inte1ro2
-8inte1ro2
’inters2
-8inters2
-8inte1ru2
’inte1ru2
inti2ment-
’i1n1u2
-8i1n1u2
’in2uit
-8in2uit
’in2u3l
-8in2u3l
is3cent-
iva3lent-
.j4
'j4
’j4
4j-
-8j4
ja3cent-
4je-
2jent-
4jes-
.k4
'k4
’k4
4k-
-8k4
4ke-
2kent-
4kes-
-8k2h4
4kh-
.l4
'l4
’l4
4l-
-8l4
-8la
-8la1te
.la3tent-
-8la3tent-
-la3tent-
-8la3tent.
4le-
2lent-
4les-
llu2ment-
l2ment-
.m4
'm4
’m4
4m-
-8m4
-8ma
-8ma2c3k
-8ma1c2r
-8mac1ro
-8macro1s2c
-8ma1g2n
-8mag1ni
-8magni1ci
-8ma2g3nici1de
-8magni1fi
-8magnifi1ca
-8ma2g3nificat
-8mag1nu
-8ma2g3num
-8ma1la
-8mala1d2r
-8malad1re
-8ma2l1a2dres
-8ma2l1a2d1ro
-8ma2l1ai1sé
-8ma2l1ap
-8ma2l1a2v
-8ma1le
-8ma2l1en
-8ma1li
-8ma2l1int
-8ma1lo
-8ma2l1oc
-8ma2l1o2d
-8ma2r1x
4me-
-8mé
mécon3tent-
-8mé1go
-8mé2g1oh
4mes-
-8mé2sa
-8mé3san
-8mé1se
-8mé2s1es
-8mé2s1i
-8mé1su
-8mé2s1u2s
-8mé1ta
-8mé1ta1s2ta
-8mi
-8mil3l
-8mil1li
-8milli1am
mi2ment-
mit3tent-
-8mo
-8mo1no
-8mono1a2
-8mono1e2
-8mono1é2
-8mono1i2
-8mono1ï2dé
-8mono1o2
-8mono1s2
-8mono1u2
monova3lent-
munifi3cent-
.n4
'n4
’n4
4n-
-8n4
’ñ4
4ñ-
.ñ4
'ñ4
-8ñ4
4ne-
2nent-
4nes-
-8no
-8no1no
-8no2n1obs
n3s2at-
n3s2ats-
nutri3ment-
-8o4
’o4
4o-
.ó4
4ó-
’ó4
'ó4
-8ó4
-8ò4
.ò4
4ò-
’ò4
'ò4
-8ô4
4ô-
’ô4
-8õ4
.õ4
'õ4
’õ4
4õ-
.ø4
'ø4
’ø4
4ø-
-8ø4
-8œ4
.œ4
'œ4
’œ4
4œ-
ô2ment-
om2ment-
omnipo3tent-
-8on1gu
’on1gu
-8on3guent.
’on3guent.
’on3guent-
'on3guent-
.on3guent-
-on3guent-
-8on3guent-
opu3lent-
or2ment-
’oua1ou
-8oua1ou
’o1vi
-8o1vi
’ovi1s2c
-8ovi1s2c
-8p4
.p4
'p4
4p-
’p4
-8pa
-8pa1na
-8pa2n1a2f
-8pa2n1a2mé
-8pa2n1a2ra
-8pa1ni
-8pa2n1is
-8pa1no
-8pa2n1o2p2h
-8pa2n1opt
-8pa1ra
-8para1c2h
-8pa2r1a2c1he
-8pa2r1a2c1hè
-8para1s2
-8pa1re
-8pa3rent.
.pa3rent-
-pa3rent-
-8pa3rent-
-8pa1r2h
-8pa2r3hé
-8pa1te
.pa3tent-
-8pa3tent-
-pa3tent-
-8pa3tent.
-8pe
4pe-
-8pé
2pent-
-8pen2ta
-8pe4r
-8pe1r1a2
-8pe1r1e2
-8pe1r1é2
-8pe1r1i2
-8pé1ri
-8péri1os
-8péri1s2
-8péri2s3s
-8péri2s3ta
-8péri1u2
perma3nent-
-8pe1r1o2
perti3nent-
-8pe1r1u2
4pes-
4ph-
-8p2h4
-8p1ha
-8pha1la
-8phalan3s2t
4p4he-
2phent-
4p4hes-
4ph4le-
4ph4les-
4ph4re-
4ph4res-
-8p2l
4p4le-
2p2lent-
4p4les-
-8p1lu
plu2ment-
-8plu1ri
-8pluri1a
-8po
polyva3lent-
-8pon1te
-8pon2tet
-8pos2t3h
-8pos1ti
-8pos2t1in
-8pos2t1o2
-8pos2t3r
-8post1s2
-8p2r
4p4re-
-8p1ré
-8pré1a2
-8pré2a3la
-8pré2au
-8pré1e2
-8pré1é2
préémi3nent-
-8pré1i2
2p2rent-
-8pré1o2
4p4res-
-8pré1s2
pré3sent-
-8pré1u2
privatdo3cent-
privatdo3zent-
-8p1ro
-8pro1é2
proémi3nent-
-8pro1g2n
-8prog1na
-8pro2g3na1t2h
-8pro1s2cé
-8prou3d2h
pru3dent-
-8p1sy
-8p2sy1c2h
-8psyc1ho
-8psycho1a2n
-8pu
-8pud1d2l
.q4
'q4
’q4
4q-
-8q4
qua2ment-
4que-
2quent-
4ques-
-8r4
.r4
'r4
’r4
4r-
rai3ment-
ra2ment-
4re-
-8re
-8ré
-8ré1a2
-8ré2a3le
-8réa1li
-8ré2a3lis
-8ré2a3lit
-8ré2aux
-8ré1e2
-8ré1é2
-8ré2el
-8ré2er
-8ré2èr
ré3gent-
-8ré1i2
-8ré2i3fi
re3lent-
reli2ment-
réma3nent-
2rent-
-8ré1o2
re3pent-
-8re1s2
4res-
-8res1ca
-8re2s3cap
-8res1ci
-8re2s3ci1si
-8re2s3ci1so
-8res1co
-8re2s3cou
-8res1c2r
-8re2s3c1ri
-8res1pe
-8re2s3pect
-8res1pi
-8re2s3pir
-8res1p2l
-8resp1le
-8re2s3plend
-8res1po
-8re2s3pons
-8res1q
-8re2s3quil
-8re2s3s
-8res1se
-8res3sent-
-res3sent-
.res3sent-
-8res3sent.
-8re2s3t
-8res1ta
-8re3s4tab
-8re3s4tag
-8re3s4tand
-8re3s4tat
-8res1té
-8re3s4tén
-8re3s4tér
-8res1ti
-8re3s4tim
-8re3s4tip
-8res1to
-8re3s4toc
-8re3s4top
-8re3s4t2r
-8rest1re
-8re4s5trein
-8rest1ri
-8re4s5trict
-8re4s5trin
-8re3s4tu
-8re3s4ty
résur3gent-
réti3cent-
-8ré1t2r
-8rét1ro
-8rétro1a2
-8réu2
-8ré2uss
4r4he-
4r4hes-
ri2ment-
rin3gent-
ru3lent-
ryth2ment-
-8s4
4s-
’s4
's4
.s4
-8š4
4š-
’š4
'š4
.š4
-8sa
-8sar1me
-sar3ment-
-8sar3ment-
-8sar3ment.
.sar3ment-
-8s2c2h4
4s4ch-
4s4c4he-
4s4c4hes-
-8se
4se-
2sent-
ser3gent-
-8ser1me
-8ser3ment-
-ser3ment-
.ser3ment-
-8ser3ment.
ser3pent-
4ses-
-8seu2le
4sh-
-8s2h4
4s4he-
2shent-
4s4hes-
slalo2ment-
-8so
-8sou1ve
-sou3vent-
.sou3vent-
-8sou3vent.
-8sou3vent-
sporu4lent-
-8s1ta
-8sta2g3n
-8s1ti
-8stil3l
-8su
-8su2b1a2
-8su3b2alt
-8su2b1é2
-8su3b2é3r
-8su1bi
-8su2b1in
-8su1b2l
-8sub1li
subli2ment-
-8subli1mi
-8su2b3limin
-8su2b3lin
-8su2b3lu
-8su1bu
-8su2b1ur
succu3lent-
su2ment-
-8su2r1a2
-8su3r2a3t
-8su2r1e2
-8su2r1é2
-8su3r2eau
-8su3r2ell
surémi3nent-
-8su3r2et
-8su2r3h
-8su1ri
-8su2r1i2m
-8su2r1inf
-8su2r1int
-8su1ro
-8su2r1of
-8su2r1ox
-8sy
-8syn1g2n
-8syng1na
-8syn2g3na1t2h
't4
’t4
.t4
4t-
-8t4
-8ta
-8ta1le
-8ta3lent-
-ta3lent-
.ta3lent-
-8ta3lent.
ta2ment-
tan3gent-
4te-
tempéra3ment-
2tent-
ter3gent-
4tes-
testa3ment-
4th-
-8t2h4
4t4he-
4t4hes-
4th4re-
4th4res-
to2ment-
tor3rent-
-8t2r
transpa3rent-
4t4re-
2t2rent-
4t4res-
-8t1ri
-8tri1a2c
-8tri1a2n
-8tri1a2t
tri3dent-
-8tri1o2n
trucu3lent-
tu2ment-
turbu3lent-
-8u4
’u4
4u-
.ú4
'ú4
’ú4
4ú-
-8ú4
4ù-
-8ù4
’ù4
.ù4
'ù4
’û4
4û-
-8û4
.ü4
'ü4
’ü4
4ü-
-8ü4
.v4
'v4
’v4
4v-
-8v4
4ve-
veni2ment-
2vent-
ventripo3tent-
4ves-
vidi2ment-
4v4re-
2v2rent-
4v4res-
-8w4
.w4
'w4
’w4
4w-
4we-
2went-
4wes-
.x4
'x4
’x4
4x-
-8x4
2xent-
4y-
-8y4
’y4
4ý-
'ý4
’ý4
-8ý4
.ý4
.ÿ4
'ÿ4
’ÿ4
4ÿ-
-8ÿ4
'z4
.z4
’z4
4z-
-8z4
.ž4
'ž4
’ž4
4ž-
-8ž4
4ze-
2zent-
4zes-
-8þ4
4þ-
’þ4
'þ4
.þ4
